Illinois, session 104th, HB2948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Transparent, Inclusive, and Competitively Neutral Energy 6Policy Act. 7    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Illinois is emerging as a national leader in clean 9    energy policy, which is exemplified by the enactment and 10    implementation of the Climate and Equitable Jobs Act 11    (Public Act 102-662).12        (2) To address the significant increase in electricity 13    demand in the State and to attract additional investment, 14    Illinois must significantly expand its clean energy 15    generation capacity.16        (3) Each incremental addition of clean energy 17    generation provides measurable value in combating climate 18    change.19        (4) Illinois consumers are best served by broad and 20    robust competition in the procurement processes that are 21    critical to achieving the State's clean energy goals.22        (5) Transparent, inclusive, and competitively neutral 23    procurement processes will help produce cost-effective   HB2948- 2 -LRB104 10163 AAS 20235 b1    outcomes for Illinois consumers while encouraging 2    investment from potential developers to support the 3    further development of clean energy resources.4        (6) In pursuit of clean energy goals, the State 5    recognizes the importance of attracting new developers and 6    resources, as well as the value of retaining existing 7    developers that have already invested in the communities, 8    workers, and infrastructure of Illinois.9        (7) Competitive procurements that enable projects to 10    compete on a level playing field help deliver the 11    highest-value clean energy solutions at the lowest cost to 12    consumers.13        (8) Restricting competition among clean energy 14    resources inappropriately transfers technology, market, 15    and operational risks from developers to taxpayers and 16    consumers.17        (9) Transparent, inclusive, and competitively neutral 18    procurement processes, which provide all qualified 19    participants with equal access to information, help: (i) 20    ensure that decisions are properly documented; (ii) foster 21    trust among bidders, investors, and the public; (iii) 22    enhance the credibility of the procurement process; and 23    (iv) strengthen confidence in the results of the 24    procurement process.25        (10) Prompt action is essential to ensure Illinois 26    remains on track to achieve its climate objectives and to   HB2948- 3 -LRB104 10163 AAS 20235 b1    implement measures that reduce energy costs for consumers.2        (11) It is the policy of the State to adopt a 3    transparent, inclusive, and competitively neutral approach 4    to decarbonizing the State's electricity sector and to 5    procure the most cost-effective clean energy resources. 6    Section 10. Procurement process. For procurements on or 7after the effective date of this Act, the procurement process 8shall be transparent, inclusive, and competitively neutral and 9shall do the following:10        (1) provide due consideration to the unique advantages 11    of each developer from all segments of the energy sector; 12    and13        (2) recognize that more inclusive procurements result 14    in greater competition among developers and lower costs 15    for consumers.